Illinois, session 104th, HB3608.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 6-401 and by adding Sections 6-420.1 and 66-420.2 as follows: 7    (625 ILCS 5/6-401)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-401)8    Sec. 6-401. Driver training schools-license required. 9    (a) No person, firm, association, partnership, or 10corporation shall operate a commercial driver training school 11driver training school or engage in the business of providing 12any Entry-Level Driver Training or Skills, Road, or Pretrip 13curriculum for commercial driving giving instruction for no 14fee hire or for a fee involving in (1) the driving of motor 15vehicles; or (2) the preparation of an applicant for 16examination given by the Secretary of State for a drivers 17license or commercial learner's permit permit, unless a 18license therefor has been issued by the Secretary. No public 19schools or educational institutions shall contract with 20entities engaged in the business of giving instruction for no 21fee hire or for a fee in the driving of commercial motor 22vehicles for the preparation of an applicant for examination 23given by the Secretary of State for a State a driver's license   HB3608- 2 -LRB104 10194 LNS 20266 b1or commercial learner's permit permit, unless a license 2therefor has been issued by the Secretary.3    This subsection (a) shall not apply to (i) public schools 4or to educational institutions in which driving instruction is 5part of the curriculum, (ii) employers with over 500 full-time 6employees giving instruction to their employees, (iii) schools 7that teach enhanced driving skills to licensed drivers as set 8forth in Article X of Chapter 6 of this Code, or (iv) driver 9rehabilitation specialists or programs in which the clients of 10the rehabilitation specialists or programs have previously 11held driver's licenses.12    (b) Any person, firm, association, partnership, or 13corporation that violates subsection (a) of this Section shall 14be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for a first offense and a 15Class 4 felony for a second or subsequent offense. 16(Source: P.A. 102-749, eff. 1-1-23.) 17    (625 ILCS 5/6-420.1 new)18    Sec. 6-420.1. Inspection of the federal Training Provider 19Registry for State licensure. The Secretary shall quarterly 20review the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration's 21Training Provider Registry and the listing of State licensed 22commercial driving schools pursuant to this Act.23        (1) The Secretary shall send a letter to each entity 24    appearing on the Federal Motor Carrier Safety 25    Administration's Training Provider Registry that is not in   HB3608- 3 -LRB104 10194 LNS 20266 b1    good standing as a licensed commercial driver training 2    school in Illinois, ordering the entity to cease 3    operations immediately.4        (2) The Secretary shall report this finding to the 5    Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration per federal 6    regulations.7        (3) For the sake of educating members of the motoring 8    public and individuals seeking a commercial driver 9    license, the Secretary shall post publicly on the 10    Secretary's website a listing of all entities cited for 11    this infraction.12        (4) If an entity remains in violation of this 13    subsection for more than 12 weeks, it is subject to 14    penalties pursuant to Section 420.2. 15    (625 ILCS 5/6-420.2 new)16    Sec. 6-420.2. Civil penalties for fraudulently attesting 17to state licensure.18    (a) Any person that violates any provision of this Act in 19relation to the requirements stated in 49 CFR 380.703 shall be 20liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $50,000 for the 21violation and an additional civil penalty not to exceed 22$10,000 for each day during which the violation continues; 23such penalties may, upon order of the Secretary or a court of 24competent jurisdiction, be made payable to the Motor Carrier 25Safety Inspection Fund.  HB3608- 4 -LRB104 10194 LNS 20266 b1    (b) The penalties provided for in this Section may be 2recovered in a civil action.3    (c) The State's Attorney of the county in which the 4violation occurred, or the Attorney General, may, at the 5request of the Secretary or on his or her own motion, institute 6a civil action for an injunction, prohibitory or mandatory, to 7restrain violations of this Act, any rule adopted under this 8Act, or any permit or term or condition of a permit or to 9require such other actions as may be necessary to address 10violations of this Act, any rule adopted under this Act, any 11permit or term or condition of a permit, or order.12    (d) The State's Attorney of the county in which the 13violation occurred, or the Attorney General, shall bring such 14actions in the name of the people of the State of Illinois. 15Without limiting any other authority which may exist for the 16awarding of attorney's fees and costs, the Secretary or a 17court of competent jurisdiction may award costs and reasonable 18attorney's fees, including the reasonable costs of expert 19witnesses and consultants, to the State's Attorney or the 20Attorney General in a case where he or she has prevailed 21against a person who has committed a willful, knowing, or 22repeated violation of this Act, any rule adopted under this 23Act, any permit or term or condition of a permit, or any order.24    (e) Any funds collected under this Section in which the 25Attorney General has prevailed shall be deposited in the Motor 26Carrier Safety Inspection Fund. Any funds collected under this   HB3608- 5 -LRB104 10194 LNS 20266 b1Section in which a State's Attorney has prevailed shall be 2retained by the county in which he or she serves.3    (f) All final orders imposing civil penalties pursuant to 4this Section shall prescribe the time for payment of such 5penalties. If any such penalty is not paid within the time 6prescribed, interest on such penalty at the rate set forth in 7subsection (a) of Section 1003 of the Illinois Income Tax Act, 8shall be paid for the period from the date payment is due until 9the date payment is received. However, if the time for payment 10is stayed during the pendency of an appeal, interest shall not 11accrue during such stay.